North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10 Inspection and Grading of Potatoes and Other Produce [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5]

4-10-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-01.1.
Responsibilities of state seed department. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-02.
Commissioner — Duties — Fees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-03.
Rules — Commissioner to adopt. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-04.
Grades for potatoes and other produce. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-05.
Labeling, branding, tagging potatoes in closed containers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.
Commissioner’s duty to make examination. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.1.
Seed potatoes — Certification requirement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.2.
Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.3.
Imported seed potatoes — Certification requirement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.4.
Exported seed potatoes — Certification requirement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-06.5.
Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-07.
Official inspection points designated by commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-08.
Shipment of potatoes from inspection point prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 92, § 18.

4-10-09.
Shipment of potatoes from undesignated points. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-10.
Potatoes shipped into state — Labeling required — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-11.
Inspector to furnish certificate after inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 57, § 5.

4-10-12.
Certificate of inspection evidence of contents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-12.1.
Liability — Potato crop quantity and quality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-13.
Grade inspection — Fees and charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 92, § 18.

4-10-14.
Misbranding potatoes and other produce. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-15.
Seizure of potatoes and other produce — Liability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-16.
Refusal to accept shipment of potatoes or other produce. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 92, § 18.

4-10-17.
Cooperation with departments and bureaus. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-18.
Fees and collections — Disposition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-19.
Enforcement — Hearing by commissioner — Application of chapter 28-32. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-20.
Prosecution for violations — Duty of attorney general and state’s attorney. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-21.
Assistance to commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-22.
Penalties for violation of chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.

4-10-23.
Plant and seed records — Exempt. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 71, § 5.